Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska16-1103
Merger authorized.

Any two or more contiguous and adjacent cities of the first class in the state may merge by complying with the requirements and procedures specified in the First-Class City Merger Act. Merger shall not be allowed across county lines.

Laws 2008, LB1056, § 3.